District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.20

Repealed

Stock certificates — Representation of shares; signers; restrictions or limitations on transferability and on issuance of shares of more than 1 class; contents.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 189, ch. 269, § 20
Sept. 2, 1957, 71 Stat. 569, Pub. L. 85-254, § 5
July 23, 1959, 73 Stat. 240, Pub. L. 86-106, § 3
Dec. 30, 1963, 77 Stat. 770, Pub. L. 88-234, § 4
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(i)-(k), 39 DCR 4863
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 28(i), 44 DCR 1271
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.20.
1981 Ed., § 29-320.
1973 Ed., § 29-908g.